Nevada, session 83, SB313.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 333 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Before entering into a contract for services without
competitive selection, the Administrator or a using agency, as
applicable, shall:
(a) Conduct market research to identify other potential
vendors of the services; and
(b) Prepare a written report regarding:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(1) The efforts made by the Administrator or using agency
to identify additional vendors; and
(2) The justification for entering into such a contract.
(c) Post a notice of the proposed contract, including, without
limitation, the report prepared pursuant to paragraph (b), on the
website of the Division for at least 11 days before awarding the
contract. The notice must include, without limitation, information
regarding the procedure for filing an objection to the award of the
contract.
2. A person may file with the Division a notice of objection to
the award of a contract for which notice was posted pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 within 11 days after the date on
which the notice was posted. The notice of objection must include,
without limitation, a written statement affirming that the person
who filed the objection is able to furnish the services.
3. Within 20 days after the receipt of the notice of objection to
the award of the contract filed pursuant to subsection 2, the
Administrator shall:
(a) Withdraw the award of the contract and award the contract
by competitive selection; or
(b) Post on the website of the Division a statement of the
justification for awarding the contract without competitive
selection.
4. A person who makes an unsuccessful objection to a
contract pursuant to this section may appeal the decision pursuant
to NRS 333.370.
5. On or before October 1 of each year, the Administrator
shall submit a compilation of the reports prepared and notices of
objection filed pursuant to this section during the immediately
preceding fiscal year to:
(a) The Interim Finance Committee;
(b) The Audit Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau; and
(c) In an even-numbered year, the Audit Subcommittee of the
Legislative Commission created by NRS 218E.240.
Sec. 2. NRS 333.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
333.280 1. [Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,]
A using agency or the Administrator on behalf of a using agency
may enter into a contract using a standard form of contract, by
solicitation in accordance with the provisions of NRS 333.300 or by
advertising in accordance with the provisions of NRS 333.310, for
the furnishing of supplies, materials , [and] equipment and services
for the period of performance stated in the solicitation or
advertisement for the contract, which must not be more than [2] 10
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
years . [. If an extended contractual period is necessary to promote
the use of a manufacturing process which emphasizes the efficient
use of energy or to promote the manufacture of products which use
recycled materials, the Administrator may enter into such a contract
for not more than 3 years.]
2. The original terms of a contract may be extended [annually]
thereafter if the conditions for such an extension are specified in the
original solicitation [,] or advertisement and the Administrator
determines that an extension is in the best interest of the State.
3. After the expiration of the period of performance stated in
the original solicitation or advertisement for a contract and the
period of any extension authorized pursuant to subsection 2, the
Administrator may approve an extension of a contract if:
(a) The period of any such extension is 4 years or less;
(b) The Administrator determines that any such extension is in
the best interest of this State; and
(c) The Administrator directs the using agency in writing to
solicit or advertise and award a contract for the supplies,
materials, equipment or services by competitive selection before
the expiration of the extension.
4. If a using agency fails to comply with the direction of the
Administrator pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 3, the
Administrator may approve an additional extension of the contract
in the manner set forth in subsection 3. If the Administrator
approves an additional extension pursuant to this subsection, the
Administrator shall submit a report regarding the extension to the
Legislative Commission. Such a report must provide sufficient
information to justify the reason that the extension was
determined to be in the best interest of this State, including,
without limitation, any information regarding the reason that the
using agency did not award a contract as directed pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 3.
5. If the Administrator submits a report to the Legislative
Commission pursuant to subsection 4, the executive head of the
using agency that is the subject of the report shall appear
personally before the Legislative Commission to explain the
reason that the using agency did not award a contract as directed
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 3.
6. The Administrator shall adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Sec. 3. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)